test/src/morphology/A-ul_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - ul: # adjectives 99 'eng /est hull/fin' - full paradigm
     ul+A+Sg+Nom: ul
     ul+A+Sg+Gen: ul
     ul+A+Sg+Par: ullõ
     ul+A+Sg+Dat: ullõn
     ul+A+Sg+Ins: ullõks
     ul+A+Sg+Ill: ullõ
     ul+A+Sg+Ela: ulstõ
     ul+A+Pl+Nom: ūlõd
     ul+A+Pl+Gen: ūlõd
     ul+A+Pl+Par: ūlidi
     ul+A+Pl+Dat: ūlõdõn
     ul+A+Pl+Ins: ūlõdõks
     ul+A+Pl+Ill: ūliž
     ul+A+Pl+Ela: ūlist
